Hawaii statutes.
§40-60 Vouchers required; procedure if not
obtainable. The comptroller shall not recognize any claim of whatsoever
nature unless an original warrant voucher is presented for the same. No
warrant shall be issued in payment for any claim except upon proper indorsement
of the warrant voucher, notwithstanding any allegation of papers having been
lost or destroyed, or of the impossibility of obtaining the prescribed original
warrant voucher, so that it could not reasonably be obtained, except on
application to one of the justices of the supreme court at chambers, who, after
summoning the comptroller, and other persons the justice may think fit, may,
upon evidence satisfactory to the justice that the requisite papers have been
lost or destroyed, or that it is impossible or impracticable to procure them,
prescribe a form of warrant voucher, which, bearing the approval of the
justice, shall then be received by the comptroller and filed as in this chapter
provided. All substitute warrant vouchers shall be considered binding on the
State and all other parties. [L 1898, c 39, §17; RL 1925, §1459; RL 1935, §585;
RL 1945, §1589; RL 1955, §34-39; am L 1957, c 152, §1; HRS §40-60; am L 1975, c
71, §5; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 14 H. 393, 395; 38 H. 310, 326.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next